vi: Hình dạng của tấm giữ bấc: Hình bầu dục; Hình chữ nhật; Tròn; Hình vuông; Khác
ro-RO: Forma bazei metalice a fitilului: Oval; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Pătrat; Altele
sk-SK: Tvar jazýčka knôtu: Oválny; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Štvorcový; Iné
de: Form der Dochtlasche: Oval; Rechteckig; Rund; Quadratisch; Andere
pt-BR: Presilha de pavio formato: Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
it: Forma della linguetta dello stoppino: Ovale; Rettangolare; Rotonda; Quadrata; Altro
nb: Formen på vekeholderen: Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkantet; Annet
zh-CN: 灯芯夹形状: 椭圆形; 矩形; 圆形; 方形; 其他
fr: Forme du support de mèche: Ovale; Rectangulaire; Ronde; Carrée; Autre
fi: Sydänlangan pohjalaatan muoto: Ovaali; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliö; Muu
ko: 심지 탭 모양: 타원형; 직사각형; 원형; 정사각형; 기타
pl: Kształt blaszki knota: Owalny; Prostokątny; Okrągły; Kwadratowy; Inny
da: Form på vægefod: Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Kvadratisk; Andet
tr: Fitil sekme şekli: Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
ja: ウィックタブの形状: 楕円形; 長方形; 丸形; 正方形; その他
en: Wick tab shape: Oval; Rectangular; Round; Square; Other
el: Σχήμα βάσης στήριξης φυτιλιού: Οβάλ; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
nl: Lont lipje vorm: Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Overig
es: Forma de la pestaña de la mecha: Ovalado; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otro
hu: Kanóctalp alakja: Ovális; Négyszögletű; Kerek; Négyzet; Egyéb
pt-PT: Formato da base do pavio: Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
zh-TW: 燭芯底座形狀: 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓形; 方形; 其他
ru: Форма крепежной пластины фитиля: Овальная; Прямоугольная; Круглая; Квадратная; Другое
cs: Tvar plíšku/stojánku knotu: Oválný; Obdélníkový; Kulatý; Čtvercový; Jiný
sv: Vekflikens form: Oval; Rektangulär; Rund; Kvadratisk; Övrigt
hr-HR: Oblik Wick kartice: Ovalno; Pravokutno; Okruglo; Kvadratno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Oblika podstavka za stenj: Ovalno; Pravokotno; Okroglo; Kvadratno; Drugo
bg-BG: Форма на държача на фитила: Овална; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Квадратна; Друго
th: รูปทรงแถบไส้ตะเกียง: วงรี; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; กลม; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Dagties plokštelės forma: Ovalus; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kvadratinis; Kita